Florida, session 2026, SB28.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 62 63 Section 1.âThe facts stated in the preamble to this act are 64 found and declared to be true. 65 Section 2.âThe City of Lakeland is authorized and directed 66 to appropriate from funds of the city not otherwise encumbered 67 and to draw a warrant in the sum of $312,500 payable to Reginald 68 Jackson as compensation for injuries and damages sustained. 69 Section 3.âThe amount paid by the City of Lakeland pursuant 70 to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the amount awarded under 71 this act are intended to provide the sole compensation for all 72 present and future claims arising out of the factual situation 73 resulting in the shooting of Reginald Jackson as described in 74 this act. The total amount paid for attorney fees relating to 75 this claim may not exceed 25 percent of the amount awarded under 76 this act. 77 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.